Hawaii statutes.
§195-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless otherwise indicated by the context:

"Board" means the board of land and
natural resources.

"Commission" means the natural area
reserves system commission.

"Cooperating entity" or
"cooperator" means a private nonprofit land-holding organization or
any other body deemed by the department as satisfactorily able to assist in the
identification, acquisition, and management of natural area reserves.

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Heritage program" means a
comprehensive natural resource inventory data base for public information that
includes the location of rare plants, animals, and natural communities
(ecosystems) in the State.

"Landowner" means any person or
entity having the fee simple interest in land in the State.

"Natural area reserve" means an area
designated as a part of the Hawaii natural area reserves system, pursuant to
criteria established by the commission. [L 1970, c 139, pt of §1; am L 1987, c
350, §2; am L 1991, c 326, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next